Wyoming, session 2025, HB0076.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 26-55-104(a)(iii) and
26-55-106(a)(iii) are amended to read:

26-55-104. Persons qualified to make adverse
determinations.

HB0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0555
(a) Each health insurer or contracted utilization
review entity shall ensure that all adverse determinations
are made by a physician or other appropriate licensed
health care provider who has:

(iii) Unless otherwise required under Wyoming
law, a current and unrestricted license to practice within
the scope of their profession in a state, territory,
commonwealth of the United States or the District of
Columbia Wyoming;

26-55-106. Requirements applicable to persons
reviewing appeals.

(a) Each health insurer or contracted utilization
review entity shall ensure that all appeals of adverse
determinations are reviewed by a physician or other
appropriate licensed health care provider who has:

(iii) A current and unrestricted license to
practice within the scope of their medical profession in a
state, territory, commonwealth of the United States or the
District of Columbia Wyoming;
HB0076

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0555

Section 2. This act applies to prior authorization
adverse determinations made or appealed on or after July 1,
2025.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0076